North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§§ 159G-1 through 159G-18.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-454, s. 2, effective January 1, 2006.

Eligibility under the Clean Water Revolving Loan and Grant Act.

Session Laws 2005-190, s. 3(d), as amended by Session Laws 2010-142, s. 17, provides: “The definitions set out in G.S. 159G-3 apply to this subsection. The operator of a wastewater treatment works that is owned by an agency of the State may apply for a loan or grant under

G.S. 159G-20

on the same basis as any other applicant if the operator is a local government unit and if the local government unit operates the wastewater treatment works pursuant to a contract with the State agency that contemplates that the local government unit will eventually acquire ownership of the wastewater treatment works.”

§ 159G-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 159G-20.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Affordability. — The relative affordability of a project for a community compared to other communities in North Carolina based on factors that shall include, at a minimum, water and sewer service rates, median household income, poverty rates, employment rates, the population of the served community, and past expenditures by the community on water infrastructure compared to that community’s capacity for financing of water infrastructure improvements.

(1a)

Asset management plan. — The strategic and systematic application of management practices applied to the infrastructure assets of a local government unit in order to minimize the total costs of acquiring, operating, maintaining, improving, and replacing the assets while at the same time maximizing the efficiency, reliability, and value of the assets.

(1b)

Authority. — The State Water Infrastructure Authority created and established pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter.

(1c)

Construction costs. — The costs of planning, designing, and constructing a project for which a loan or grant is available under this Chapter. The term includes the following:

Excess or reserve capacity costs attributable to no more than 20-year projected domestic growth plus ten percent (10%) unspecified industrial growth.

Legal, fiscal, administrative, and contingency costs.

The fee imposed under

G.S. 159G-24

to obtain a loan or grant for a project.

A fee payable to the Department for a permit to implement a project for which a loan or grant is obtained.

The cost to acquire real property or an interest in real property.

CWSRF. — The Clean Water State Revolving Fund established in

G.S. 159G-22

as an account in the Water Infrastructure Fund.

Department. — The Department of Environmental Quality.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(ggg), effective July 1, 2011.

(4a)

Distressed unit. — A public water system or wastewater system operated by a local government unit exhibiting signs of failure to identify or address those financial or operating needs necessary to enable that system to become or to remain a local government unit generating sufficient revenues to adequately fund management and operations, personnel, appropriate levels of maintenance, and reinvestment that facilitate the provision of reliable water or wastewater services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(d), effective July 1, 2013 and Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(q), effective August 23, 2013.

(5a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(d), effective July 1, 2013.

(5b)

Division. — Division of Water Infrastructure.

Drinking Water Reserve. — The Drinking Water Reserve established in

G.S. 159G-22

as an account in the Water Infrastructure Fund.

DWSRF. — The Drinking Water State Revolving Fund established in

G.S. 159G-22

as an account in the Water Infrastructure Fund.

Grant. — A sum of money given to an applicant without any obligation on the part of the applicant to repay the sum.

, (10) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(b), effective July 1, 2015.

(10a)

Investor-owned drinking water corporation. — A corporation owned by investors and incorporated solely for the purpose of providing drinking water services for profit.

(11)

Loan. — A sum of money loaned to an applicant with an obligation on the part of the applicant to repay the sum.

(12)

Local Government Commission. — The Local Government Commission of the Department of the State Treasurer, established in

G.S. 159-3

.

(13)

Local government unit. — Any of the following:

A city as defined in

G.S. 160A-1

.

A county.

A consolidated city-county as defined in

G.S. 160B-2

.

Any of the following entities created pursuant to Chapter 162A of the General Statutes:

A water and sewer authority created pursuant to Article 1.

A metropolitan water district created pursuant to Article 4.

A metropolitan sewerage district created pursuant to Article 5.

A metropolitan water and sewerage district created pursuant to Article 5A.

A county water and sewer district created pursuant to Article 6.

, f.Repealed by Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2020.

g.

A sanitary district created pursuant to Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

h.

A joint agency created pursuant to Part 1 or Part 5 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

A joint agency that was created by agreement between two cities and towns to operate an airport pursuant to

G.S. 63-56

and that provided drinking water and wastewater services off the airport premises before 1 January 1995.

(13a)

Merger. — The consolidation of two or more water and/or sewer systems into one system with common ownership, management, and operation.

(14)

Nonprofit water corporation. — A nonprofit corporation that is incorporated under Chapter 55A of the General Statutes solely for the purpose of providing drinking water or wastewater services and is an eligible applicant for a federal loan or grant from the Rural Utility Services Division, U.S. Department of Agriculture.

(14a)

Operating deficit. — The shortage between revenues plus available reserves and operating expenditures, including capital expenditures, necessary to maintain operations in a distressed unit.

(15)

Public water system. — Defined in

G.S. 130A-313

.

(16)

Regionalization. — The physical interconnecting of an eligible entity’s wastewater system to another entity’s wastewater system for the purposes of providing regional treatment or the physical interconnecting of an eligible entity’s public water system to another entity’s water system for the purposes of providing regional water supply.

(17)

Reserved.

(18)

Secretary. — The Secretary of Environmental Quality.

(19)

State. — The State of North Carolina.

(20)

Stormwater quality project. — A project whose primary purpose is to prevent or remove pollution from stormwater rather than collect, store, or convey stormwater for drainage or flood control purposes.

(21)

Targeted interest rate project. — Either of the following types of projects:

a.

A project that is awarded a loan from the Drinking Water Reserve or the Wastewater Reserve based on affordability.

b.

A project that is awarded a loan from the CWSRF or the DWSRF and is in a category for which federal law encourages a special focus.

(22)

Treasurer. — The Treasurer of the State elected pursuant to Article III, Section 7, of the Constitution.

(22a)

Viable Utility Reserve. — The Viable Utility Reserve established in

G.S. 159G-22

as an account in the Water Infrastructure Fund.

(23)

Wastewater collection system. — A unified system of pipes, conduits, pumping stations, force mains, and appurtenances for collecting and transmitting water-carried human wastes and other wastewater from residences, industrial establishments, or any other buildings.

(24)

Wastewater Reserve. — The Wastewater Reserve established in

G.S. 159G-22

as an account in the Water Infrastructure Fund.

(25)

Wastewater system. — A wastewater collection system, wastewater treatment works, stormwater quality project, or nonpoint source pollution project.

(26)

Wastewater treatment works. — The various facilities and devices used in the treatment of sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes of a liquid nature, including the necessary interceptor sewers, outfall sewers, nutrient removal equipment, pumping equipment, power and other equipment, and their appurtenances.

(27)

Water Infrastructure Fund. — The fund established in G.S. 159G-22.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2010-151, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 13.3(ggg), 13.11A(a); 2013-360, s. 14.21(d); 2013-413, s. 57(q); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-241, ss. 14.13(a), (b), 14.30(u), (v); 2019-241, s. 11(d); 2020-79, ss. 1(a), 6(a).

Establish Standards and Pilot Program for Highly Treated Wastewater.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.26(a)-(g) provides: “Establish Standards and Pilot Program for Highly Treated Wastewater.

“(a) The following definitions apply in this section:

“(1) Highly treated wastewater. – Effluent discharged from a wastewater system that is designed and operated to meet the following standards:

“a. With respect to the carbonaceous biological oxygen demand (CBOD5), 10mg/L.

“b. With respect to NH3, 10mg/L.

“c. With respect to total nitrogen, 10mg/L, or a minimum of sixty percent (60%) reduction from the influent total Kjeldahl nitrogen.

“d. With respect to total phosphorus, 5mg/L, unless discharged into nutrient sensitive waters.

“e. With respect to fecal coliforms, 10 colonies/100mL.

“f. Capture and removal of residual sludge and biogases.

“g. With respect to total suspended solids, less than or equal to 10mg/L.

“(2) Wastewater system. – Defined in

G.S. 130A-334

.

“(b) Funds allocated from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the Innovative Highly Treated Wastewater Pilot Program (Program) shall be provided to the North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) to establish the Program as described in this subsection. The Collaboratory may use up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated by this subsection for research and administrative costs related to the Program, of which up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be used to reimburse the Department of Environmental Quality for its administrative costs. Project funding from the funds allocated by this section is limited to the lesser of forty percent (40%) of the total project cost or four million dollars ($4,000,000). In implementing the Program, the Collaboratory shall do the following:

“(1) Review and evaluate wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices for suitability as a wastewater treatment option for local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities considered distressed, as defined by

G.S. 159G-20

, that (i) have no more than 10,000 customers or (ii) include residential or commercial developments or subdivisions that are unable to be served by existing wastewater systems.

“(2) Identify no less than five local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection as participants in the Program.

“(3) Work with Program participants to submit permit applications to the Department of Environmental Quality and, upon permit approval, to construct the wastewater systems.

“(4) Conduct research and monitoring to quantify the efficacy of the wastewater systems funded and built as part of the Program. The Collaboratory shall share results of this research with Program participants and the Department.

“(c) The Department of Environmental Quality shall do the following with respect to entities receiving wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater under subsection (b) of this section to the extent not inconsistent with its National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permitting authority delegated from the United States Environmental Protection Agency:

“(1) Review and qualify wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices. The Department shall require the manufacturer of the wastewater system within five days of the qualification under this subdivision to file with the Department a performance bond or other surety with a minimum term of five years to be executed in favor of the permittee in the amount sufficient to cover system replacement. Operation, maintenance, abuse, or change in hydraulic flows or wastewater characteristics shall not be attached to the performance bond or surety.

“(2) Work with the entities identified under subsection (b) of this section to permit the wastewater systems meeting the standards for highly treated wastewater set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The system must be consistent with the action plan developed by the entities as set forth in G.S. 159G-45(b)(3).

“(d) No later than December 1, 2024, the Collaboratory, with the assistance of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall provide a report to the Environmental Management Commission and the Environmental Review Commission evaluating the systems permitted under the pilot program established in this section. The report shall assess the effectiveness of these systems compared to the systems previously operated by the local government, sanitary district, or public authority, along with suggestions for further legislation and rulemaking necessary to support the adoption of highly treated wastewater systems.

“(e) The Commission for Public Health shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to provide for approval of treatment system applications for use in the State and create benefits for systems producing higher wastewater treatment levels that are proportional and graduated. These rules shall include, at a minimum, the following:

“(1) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for provisional wastewater systems, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(7), from manufacturers of wastewater systems with certification and listing for one or more years from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved within 45 days of receipt of a complete application. The proposed wastewater system listed in the application shall be identical in design and features to the wastewater system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body.

“(2) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for proposed wastewater systems without certification and listing from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved as provisional and shall allow the issuance of a maximum of 200 improvement permits and authorizations for wastewater system construction.

“(3) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for innovative status of a wastewater system shall be approved (i) after two years of certification and listing by a nationally recognized certification body and one year of field data in this State or other states or countries approved by DHHS or (ii) if not listed by a nationally recognized body, after completion of provisional status requirements in accordance with G.S. 130A-343(f). For systems receiving innovative status as a result of receiving national certification, those systems shall be identical to the system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body and identical to the systems installed in this State and approved by DHHS or other states or countries.

“(4) Applications for wastewater systems and dispersal products received after the effective date of this subsection shall demonstrate structural integrity, including subjecting the trench system to axle load of 16,000 pounds when covered with 12 inches of compacted soil and 4,000 pounds when covered with 6 inches of compacted soil without breakage, collapse, fracture, or compression that prevents the downline distribution of wastewater. Wastewater treatment devices with identifying surface or above grade access for operation and maintenance shall be excluded from load testing when installed and backfilled in accordance with the rules or the product approval.

“(5) Wastewater systems found by DHHS to meet standards for reclaimed water based on (i) field demonstrations over a two-year period in this State or other states approved by DHHS that the system meets reclaimed water standards or (ii) certification and listing by a nationally recognized body, such as the National Sanitation Foundation Standard 350, shall be approved for designs that eliminate repair area rules in Type I soils. Elimination of repair areas shall be considered for domestic strength wastewater only. Systems permitted without repair area under this subsection shall be classified by DHHS as a Type VI(b) system under DHHS rules and shall be inspected no less than 12 times per year.

“(6) Vertical and horizontal restrictions to property lines and limiting conditions for systems approved under this subsection shall be reduced proportionally to the graduated increases in wastewater quality.

“(f) The Commission for Public Health and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report quarterly on their implementation of subsection (d) of this section beginning no later than May 1, 2022, and shall continue quarterly reporting until rulemaking activities required by this section have been completed.

“(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. Funds allocated by this section that are not spent or encumbered by June 30, 2024, shall revert to the Wastewater Reserve to be used for any of the purposes authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.”

Editor’s Note.

The definitions have been put in alphabetical order at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Subdivision (28) as added by Session Laws
2010-151, s. 1, was renumbered as subdivision (1), at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes. Former subdivision (1) was renumbered as subdivision (1a), also at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2019-241, s. 11(d), amended this section by adding a subdivision (14a), contingent upon 2019 SB 553 or 2019 HB 966 or substantially similar provision becoming law. SB 553 and HB 966 were both vetoed, and the General Assembly failed to override. Session Laws
2020-79, s. 6(a), repealed Session Laws
2019-241, s. 11(d).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-151, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010, and applicable to applications for loans and grants submitted on or after that date, added subdivision (28) (now (1)).

Session Laws 2011-145, ss. 13.3(ggg), 13.11A(a), effective July 1, 2011, deleted subdivision (4), which was the definition of “Division of Environmental Health”; and added subdivisions (5a) and (10a).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(d), effective July 1, 2013, deleted subdivisions (5) and (5a); and added subdivision (5b).

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(q), effective August 23, 2015, repealed subdivision (5).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(a), (b), effective July 1, 2015, added subdivisions (1), (1b), (13a), and (16); redesignated former subdivision (1) as (1a) and former subdiviion (1a) as (1c); deleted former subdivisions (9) and (10), which defined “High-unit-cost project” and “High-unit-cost threshold”; and rewrote sub-subdivision (21)a., which formerly read: “A high-unit-cost project that is awarded a loan.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (3); and substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (18).

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2020, added subdivision (4a); rewrote sub-subdivision (13)d.; deleted subdivisions (13)e. and (13)f.; added “or Part 5” in sub-subdivision (13)h.; and added subdivisions (14a) and (22a).

§ 159G-21.
Revenue for water projects.

This Chapter governs the use of the following revenue:

Revenue appropriated to the Department to match federal funds received for loans and grants for wastewater and drinking water projects and revenue received by the Department from the repayment of loans made with the use of the federal funds.

Revenue appropriated to the Department to provide a source of State funds to make loans and grants for wastewater and drinking water projects and revenue received by the Department from the repayment of loans made with the use of these funds.

History.

2005-454, s. 3.

§ 159G-22.
Water Infrastructure Fund.

Fund Established. — The Water Infrastructure Fund is established as a special revenue fund. The Fund is comprised of the accounts set out in this section. The Fund provides revenue through its accounts for loans and grants as provided in this Chapter to meet the water infrastructure needs of the State. The Treasurer is responsible for distributing and investing all revenue received by the Fund. Interest and other investment income earned by the Fund accrues to it and must be allocated to the account to which the income is attributable. Accounts to which federal funds are credited must be kept separate from accounts that do not receive federal funds. A payment of the principal of or interest on a loan made from an account of the Fund must be credited to the account from which the loan was made.

CWSRF. — The Clean Water State Revolving Fund is established as an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund. The account receives federal funds for wastewater projects and the State funds required to match the federal funds. The account is established under and must be managed in accordance with Title VI of the Federal Water Quality Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-4, to achieve the purposes of that act and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act of 1972, 33 U.S.C. §§ 1251 through 1387. The account must comply with these federal acts and the federal regulations adopted to implement the acts. Revenue credited to the account is available in perpetuity and must be used only to provide construction loans and other assistance allowed under federal law. Grants are available from this account only to the extent allowed under federal law.

DWSRF. — The Drinking Water State Revolving Fund is established as an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund. The account receives federal funds for public water systems and the State funds required to match the federal funds. The account is established under and must be managed in accordance with section 130 of Title 1 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of 1996 as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 300J-12, to achieve the purposes of that act. The account must comply with that act and the federal regulations adopted to implement the act. Revenue credited to the account is available in perpetuity and must be used only to provide construction loans and other assistance allowed under federal law. Grants are available from this account only to the extent allowed under federal law.

Wastewater Reserve. — The Wastewater Reserve is established as an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund. The account is established to receive State funds that are to be used for loans and grants for wastewater systems. Revenue credited to the Reserve is neither received from the federal government nor provided as a match for federal funds.

Wastewater Accounts. — The Department is directed to establish accounts within the Wastewater Reserve to administer loans and grants for wastewater collection systems, wastewater treatment works, stormwater quality projects, and nonpoint source pollution projects. The wastewater accounts must include an account for each type of loan or grant set out in

G.S. 159G-33

.

Drinking Water Reserve. — The Drinking Water Reserve is established as an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund. The account is established to receive State funds that are to be used for loans and grants for public water systems. Revenue credited to the Reserve is neither received from the federal government nor provided as a match for federal funds.

Drinking Water Accounts. — The Department is directed to establish accounts within the Drinking Water Reserve to administer loans and grants for public water systems. The drinking water accounts must include an account for each type of loan or grant set out in

G.S. 159G-34

.

Viable Utility Reserve. — The Viable Utility Reserve is established as an account within the Water Infrastructure Fund. The account is established to receive appropriated State funds to be used for grants to local government units for those purposes authorized under this Article. Revenue credited to the Viable Utility Reserve is neither received from the federal government nor provided as a match for federal funds.

Viable Utility Accounts. — The Department is directed to establish accounts within the Viable Utility Reserve to administer grants for public water systems or wastewater systems owned by local government units.

Unused CWSRF and DWSRF State Match. — Funds appropriated to the Department for the Clean Water State Revolving Fund or the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund to provide State matching funds that are in excess of the amount required to draw down all available federal capitalization grant funds may also be used for water and wastewater infrastructure grants awarded from the Wastewater Reserve, the Drinking Water Reserve, or the Viable Utility Reserve.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2020-79, s. 1(b); 2021-180, s. 12.12(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 14.20, provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 159G-22

, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources may transfer State funds from the Drinking Water Reserve to the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund for the 2013-2014 fiscal year and shall use any such funds to match maximum available federal grant monies authorized by section 1453 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of 1996,
42 U.S.C. § 300j-12, as amended.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 14.21(a), provides: “The Division of Water Infrastructure is established as a new division within the environmental area of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Department of Environmental Quality]. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Quality of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. The Water Infrastructure Fund established under

G.S. 159G-22

and all accounts within the Water Infrastructure Fund under

G.S. 159G-22

shall be transferred to and administered by the Division of Water Infrastructure. In addition to its other duties set forth in Chapter 159G, the Division of Water Infrastructure shall be responsible for administering the program whereby local government units are awarded funds by the State Water Infrastructure Authority created by this section for infrastructure projects from community development block grant funds.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(b), effective July 1, 2020, added subsections (h) and (i).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 12.12(a), effective July 1, 2021, added subsection (j).

§ 159G-23.
Priority consideration for loan or grant from Wastewater Reserve or Drinking Water Reserve.

The considerations for priority in this section apply to a loan or grant from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve. The Division of Water Infrastructure must consider the following items when evaluating applications:

Public necessity. — A project that promotes public health and protects the environment, improves a system that is not in compliance with permit requirements or is under orders from the Department, enables a moratorium to be lifted, or replaces failing septic tanks with a wastewater collection system.

Effect on impaired waters. — A project that improves designated impaired waters of the State, with greater priority given to projects that improve designated impaired waters of the State that serve as a public water supply for a large public water system. For purposes of this subdivision, a large public water system is one serving more than 175,000 service connections.

Efficiency. — A project that achieves efficiencies in meeting the State’s water infrastructure needs or reduces vulnerability to drought consistent with Part 2A of Article 21 and Article 38 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes by one of the following methods:

The combination of two or more wastewater or public water systems into a regional wastewater or public water system by merger, consolidation, or another means.

Conservation or reuse of water, including bulk water reuse facilities and waterlines to supply reuse water for irrigation and other approved uses.

Construction of an interconnection between water systems intended for use in drought or other water shortage emergency.

Repair or replacement of leaking waterlines to improve water conservation and efficiency or to prevent contamination.

Replacement of meters and installation of new metering systems.

Comprehensive land-use plan. — A project that is located in a city or county that has adopted or has taken significant steps to adopt a comprehensive land-use plan under Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. The existence of a plan has more priority than steps taken to adopt a plan, such as adoption of a zoning ordinance. A plan that exceeds the minimum State standards for protection of water resources has higher priority than one that does not. A project is considered to be located in a city or county if it is located in whole or in part in that unit. A land-use plan is not considered a comprehensive land-use plan unless it has provisions that protect existing water uses and ensure compliance with water quality standards and classifications in all waters of the State affected by the plan.

Flood hazard ordinance. — A project that is located in a city or county that has adopted a flood hazard prevention ordinance under

G.S. 143-215.54

A. A plan that exceeds the minimum standards under

G.S. 143-215.54

A for a flood hazard prevention ordinance has higher priority than one that does not. A project is considered to be located in a city or county if it is located in whole or in part in that unit. If no part of the service area of a project is located within the 100-year floodplain, the project has equal consideration under this subdivision as if it were located in a city or county that has adopted a flood hazard prevention ordinance. The most recent maps prepared pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Program or approved by the Department determine whether an area is within the 100-year floodplain.

Sound management. — A project submitted by a local government unit that has demonstrated a willingness and ability to meet its responsibilities through sound fiscal policies and efficient operation and management.

(6a)

Asset management plan. —

A project submitted by a local government unit with more than 1,000 service connections that has developed and is implementing an asset management plan.

Capital improvement plan. — A project that implements the applicant’s capital improvement plan for the wastewater system or public water system it manages, so long as the capital improvement plan sets out the applicant’s expected water infrastructure needs for at least 10 years.

Coastal habitat protection. — A project that implements a recommendation of a Coastal Habitat Protection Plan adopted by the Environmental Management Commission, the Coastal Resources Commission, and the Marine Fisheries Commission pursuant to G.S. 143B-279.8. If no part of the service area of a project is located within a county subject to that Plan, the project has equal priority under this subdivision with a project that receives priority under this subdivision.

Affordability. — The relative affordability of a project for a community compared to other communities in North Carolina.

Merger and Regionalization. — A project to provide for the planning of regional public water and wastewater systems, to provide for the orderly coordination of local actions relating to public water and wastewater systems, or to help realize economies of scale in regional public water and wastewater systems through consolidation, management, merger, or interconnection of public water and wastewater systems. If an applicant demonstrates that it is not feasible for the project to include regionalization, the funding agency shall assign the project the same priority under this subdivision as a project that includes regionalization.

Improve regional coordination. — A project that addresses a potential conflict between local plans or implements a measure in which local water supply plans could be better coordinated.

Water conservation measures for drought. — A project that includes adoption of water conservation measures by a local government unit that are more stringent than the minimum water conservation measures required pursuant to

G.S. 143-355.2

.

Low-income residents. — A project that is located in an area annexed by a municipality under Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes in order to provide water or sewer services to low-income residents.

Disproportionate burden to protect water supply of higher-wealth neighboring local government unit. — Wastewater system improvements made by a local government unit in order to protect or preserve the water supply of a neighboring local government unit that has a lower poverty rate, lower utility bills, higher population growth, higher median household incomes, and lower unemployment.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2008-143, s. 15; 2010-151, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 13.3(hhh); 2011-396, s. 11.2; 2013-360, s. 14.21(e); 2013-413, s. 57(r); 2014-115, s. 17; 2015-241, s. 14.13(c); 2021-117, s. 4(a).

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (9), enacted by Session Laws 2011-396, s. 11.2, was renumbered as subdivision (13) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2008-143, s. 20, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to expand or limit the authority of a unit of government or public water supply system to regulate water use from a well located outside of its jurisdiction, a well not connected to its water system, or any other private well.”

Session Laws 2011-396, s. 12, provides: “Except for Sections 10, 11.1, and 11.2, this act does not apply to any municipality that in its charter requires that an annexation must be approved by (i) either the voters in a referendum or at the request of a majority of the property owners; (ii) the voters in a referendum; or (iii) the request of a majority of the property owners.” Sections 10, 11.1, and 11.2 amended

G.S. 160A-31

, 143B-437.04(a), and 159G-23, respectively.

Session Laws 2011-396, s. 13, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2011-396, s. 14, provides: “This act is effective when it becomes law [July 1, 2011] and applies to annexations initiated by municipalities on or after that date and to petitions for annexation under Part 1 and Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes presented on or after that date. Annexations initiated prior to the effective date of this act by any action under Part 2 or Part 3 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, but for which an annexation ordinance has not been adopted, shall terminate and may be reinitiated in compliance with Part 7 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes as enacted by this act.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(o), provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes may conform names and titles changed by this section and may correct statutory references as required by this section throughout the General Statutes.” Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes made conforming changes in this section.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2021-117, s. 4(b), made the amendments to subdivisions (2), (11), and (14) of this section by Session Laws 2021-117, s. 4(a), effective September 1, 2021, and applicable to applications for loans or grants from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve received by the Division of Water Infrastructure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-143, s. 15, effective July 31, 2008, in subdivision (3), inserted “or reduces vulnerability to drought consistent with Part 2A of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes” in the introductory language; in subdivision (3)b, added “including bulk water reuse facilities and waterlines to supply reuse water for irrigation and other approved uses”; and added subdivisions (3)c through (3)e.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(hhh), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health” in the introductory paragraph.

Session Laws 2011-396, s. 11.2, effective July 1, 2011, added subdivision (13). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(e), effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Infrastructure” for “Quality and the Division of Water Resources” in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph.

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(r), in the second sentence of the introductory paragraph, deleted “Division of Water Quality and the” preceding “Division of Water” and “each” preceding “establish.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.13(c), effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2021-117, s. 4(a), rewrote subdivisions (2) and (11); and added subdivision (14). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.